Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MILESTONE COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Milestone Community Development for the Milestone Tech Cybersecurity Training Program in partnership with Saint Mary University. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end